Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. State Veterinary Board

§ 2411.
Qualifications; term of office; removal.

A State Veterinary Board is created, which shall be the continuation of and successor to the State Board of Veterinary Registration and Examination established by chapter 43, subchapter 2 of this title.

The Board shall consist of six members, four of whom are residents of the State and are graduates of a school of veterinary medicine, and who have had at least five years’ experience in the State and are in the active practice of veterinary medicine at the time of their appointment; and two members who shall be representatives of the public who shall be residents of the State for five years and who shall have no financial interest in the profession other than as consumers or potential consumers of its services. They shall have no financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister. The public members shall participate in all Board functions with the exception of drafting and grading examinations.

Board members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 69.

§ 2412.
Functioning of licensing Board.

Annually, the Board shall meet to elect a chair, vice chair, and a secretary.

Meetings may be called by the Chair and shall be called upon the request of any other three members.

A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for transacting business and all action shall be taken upon a majority vote of the members present and voting.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 70.

§ 2413.
Powers and duties.

The Board shall:

Adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 necessary for the performance of its duties, ensuring that at least the following are established by statute or rule:

a definition of the behavior for which a license is required;

explanations of appeal and other significant rights given by law to licensees, applicants, and the public; and

rules of practice in disciplinary cases, including provisions regarding representation and evidence at hearings and provisions regarding subpoenas and witness fees.

Conduct any necessary hearings in connection with the issuance, renewal, suspension, or revocation of a license or otherwise related to the disciplining of a licensee.

Receive complaints and charges of unprofessional conduct against any holder of a license. The Board shall investigate all complaints in which there are reasonable grounds to believe that unprofessional conduct has occurred.

The Board may:

with the approval of the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation, make contracts and arrangements for the performance of administrative and similar services required or appropriate in the performance of its duties;

issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any authorized investigation, hearing, or disciplinary proceeding;

take or cause depositions to be taken as needed in any investigation, hearing, or proceeding;

receive legal assistance from the Attorney General of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1985, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d).

§ 2414.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application $ 100.00 (2) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>Biennial renewal $ 175.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 57;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Feb. 16, 1994;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2015, No. 57

, § 3;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.